Hawaii statutes.
§431:2-207 Contempt proceedings. If
any individual fails to obey the subpoena, or obeys the subpoena but refuses to
testify when required concerning any matter under examination, investigation or
the subject of the hearing, the commissioner shall file a written report
thereof and proof of service of the commissioner's subpoena in the circuit
court of the county where the examination, investigation or hearing is being
conducted. Thereupon the court shall forthwith cause the individual to be
brought before it to show cause why the individual should not be held in
contempt, and if so held, may punish the individual as if the failure or
refusal related to a subpoena from or testimony in that court. [L 1987, c 347,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next